Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; U.S. HIGHWAY 7 CORRIDOR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign, design, land acquisition, preconstruction, and construction of safety improvements along the marked U.S. Highway 7 corridor in the cities of Shorewood, Excelsior, Minnetrista, St. Bonifacius, and Greenwood. This appropriation is available for use on portions of the project eligible for trunk highway funds. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end